Utah statutes.
53-2a-213.   Authority additional to other emergency authority.

The special disaster emergency authority vested in the governor and political subdivisions of the state pursuant to this part shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other emergency authority otherwise constitutionally or statutorily vested in the governor and political subdivisions of the state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

